Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2327SV (3) 91 ss/ko S.F. 551 Section 1. Section 157.8A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 157.8A Use of schools of barbering and cosmetology arts and 3 sciences. 4 1. A school of barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences 5 may be used for purposes other than student instruction so long 6 as the other activities do not disrupt classes. 7 2. An instructor employed by a school of barbering and 8 cosmetology arts and sciences may perform barbering and 9 cosmetology arts and sciences services at the school of 10 barbering and cosmetology arts and sciences for compensation 11 while not instructing students. 12 3. The board shall adopt rules for the implementation of 13 this section . 14 Sec. 2. Section 157.10, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. The board may approve a course of study 17 allowing a student to simultaneously study for licenses to 18 practice both esthetics and nail technology. A student who 19 partially completes a combined course of study for licensure 20 for the practice of esthetics and nail technology is not 21 eligible for licensure for the practice of esthetics or nail 22 technology unless the student has completed the licensure 23 requirements for the practice of esthetics or nail technology. 24 The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A for the 25 implementation of this paragraph. 26 Sec. 3. Section 157.11, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 3. A licensed school of barbering and cosmetology arts and 29 sciences at which students or licensees practice barbering and 30 cosmetology arts and sciences is exempt from licensing as an 31 establishment. 32